Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0827.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8a. (1) The department shall develop a training course regarding a release of carbon dioxide from a carbon dioxide capture project, carbon dioxide pipeline, or carbon dioxide sequestration project that includes all of the following: (a) How to identify a carbon dioxide release. (b) Communications procedures to quickly share information about a carbon dioxide release, including alarms, sirens, text message alerts, and other means of alerting the public. (c) Procedures for locating residents and others in the affected area and, if necessary, transporting individuals in the affected area out of the area to health care facilities or shelters. (d) Symptoms of and treatment for exposure to a carbon dioxide release. (e) Any other topic that the department determines is relevant to an emergency response to a release of carbon dioxide from a carbon dioxide capture project, carbon dioxide pipeline, or carbon dioxide sequestration project. (2) The department shall consult with emergency care providers, first responders, local health departments, local governments, the homeland security division of the department of state police, and any other person that the department determines is necessary in developing the training course and training materials for the course. The department shall make the training course available at no cost on its public website. (3) The department shall provide the training course, or contract with a local government, local health department, or third party to provide the training course, to all of the following: (a) Disaster relief forces. (b) Operators. (c) Health care facilities. (d) Emergency first responders. (4) The carbon dioxide emergency planning and training fund is created in the state treasury. (5) The state treasurer shall deposit money received from the carbon dioxide sequestration fund or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (6) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (7) The director shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To develop and provide the training course and training materials as described in subsections (1) and (2). (b) To provide grants to local governments, disaster relief forces, emergency health care providers and medical personnel, or other persons for any of the following: (i) Costs to attend the training course. (ii) Costs for enhancing emergency preparedness and emergency response capabilities in the event of a carbon dioxide release, including, but not limited to, additional personnel or volunteer support required to adequately respond to and manage a release of carbon dioxide. (iii) Costs to prepare emergency response plans for carbon dioxide release. (iv) The purchase of electric vehicles for use in responding to a carbon dioxide release. (v) The purchase of devices that assist in the detection of a carbon dioxide release. (vi) The purchase of equipment that assists in the preparation for, detection of, or response to a release of carbon dioxide or other toxic or hazardous materials for first responders, local residents, and medical facilities. (c) Other expenditures the director considers necessary to aid in the protection of public safety from a release of carbon dioxide pipeline, including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide monitors and air supply respirators. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Carbon dioxide capture project" means that term as defined in section 5501 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5501. (b) "Carbon dioxide pipeline" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1929 PA 16, MCL 483.1. (c) "Carbon dioxide sequestration project" means that term as defined in section 65101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.65101. (d) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (e) "Director" means the director of the department or the director's designee. (f) "Operator" means a person who owns or operates a carbon dioxide capture project, carbon dioxide pipeline, or carbon dioxide sequestration project. ?Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)    Senate Bill No. 822. (b)    Senate Bill No. 823. (c)    Senate Bill No. 824. (d)    Senate Bill No. 825. (e)    Senate Bill No. 826.